Utah statutes.
76-6-409.8.   Sale of an unlawful telecommunication device -- Penalty.

(1)  Any person is guilty of a third degree felony who intentionally sells an unlawful telecommunication device or material, including hardware, data, computer software, or other information or equipment, knowing that the purchaser or a third person intends to use such material in the manufacture of an unlawful telecommunication device.

(2)  If the offense under this section involves the intentional sale of five or more unlawful telecommunication devices within a six-month period, the person committing the offense is guilty of a second degree felony.

